Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.030

"License" defined.

The word "license" shall be construed to mean and include license, certificate of registration, certificate of qualification, certificate of competency, certificate of authority, and any other instrument, by whatever name designated, authorizing the practice of a profession or calling, the carrying on of a business or occupation, or the doing of any act required by law to be authorized by the state.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.24.030. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 98; RRS s 10856.]